API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 206 Y 38
SFX 206 0 වෙනවා .
SFX 206 0 වෙමි .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 206 0 වෙමු .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 206 0 වෙහි .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 206 0 වෙහු .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නේය .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නීය .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නාය .
SFX 206 0 වෙති .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නෝය .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්න .
SFX 206 0 වෙව .
SFX 206 0 වෙනු .
SFX 206 0 වෙපිය .
SFX 206 0 වොපිය .
SFX 206 0 වෙපන් .
SFX 206 0 වොපන් .
SFX 206 0 වෙව් .
SFX 206 0 වෙපියව් .
SFX 206 0 වොපියව් .
SFX 206 0 වෙපල්ලා .
SFX 206 0 වොපල්ලා .
SFX 206 0 වෙනවාලා .
SFX 206 0 වෙයිලු .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නේලු .
SFX 206 0 වෙතිලු .
SFX 206 0 වෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 206 0 වෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 206 0 වෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 206 0 වොපුවාවේ .
SFX 206 0 වෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 206 0 වොපුදෙන් .
SFX 206 0 වොවි .
SFX 206 0 වෙේවි .
SFX 207 Y 38
SFX 207 0 වුණා .
SFX 207 0 වුණෙමි .
SFX 207 0 වුණෙමු .
SFX 207 0 වුණෙහි .
SFX 207 0 වුණෙහු .
SFX 207 0 වුණේය .
SFX 207 0 විණ .
SFX 207 0 විණි .
SFX 207 0 වුණි .
SFX 207 0 වීය . 	
SFX 207 0 වුණාය .
SFX 207 0 වුණෝය .
SFX 207 0 වුණහ .
SFX 207 0 වියහ .
SFX 207 0 වුණාලු .
SFX 207 0 වුණේලු .
SFX 207 0 වුණහලු .
SFX 207 0 වුණෝලු .
SFX 207 0 වුණාවේ .
SFX 207 0 වුණදෙන් .
SFX 207 0 වුනා .
SFX 207 0 වුනෙමි .
SFX 207 0 වුනෙමු .
SFX 207 0 වුනෙහි .
SFX 207 0 වුනෙහු .
SFX 207 0 වුනේය .
SFX 207 0 වින .
SFX 207 0 විනි .
SFX 207 0 වුනි .
SFX 207 0 වුනාය .
SFX 207 0 වුනහ .
SFX 207 0 වුනෝය .
SFX 207 0 වුනාලු .
SFX 207 0 වුනේලු .
SFX 207 0 වුනහලු .
SFX 207 0 වුනෝලු .
SFX 207 0 වුනාවේ .
SFX 207 0 වුනදෙන් .
SFX 208 Y 17
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වා  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වෙමි  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වෙමු  . 
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වෙහි  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වෙහු  . 
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වේය  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වාය  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වහ  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වෝය  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වාලු  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වේලු  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වහලු  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වෝලු  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වාවේ  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වදෙන්  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වාදෙන්  .
SFX 208 0 ෙව්වපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 209 Y 5
SFX 209 0 ීමි .
SFX 209 0 ූමු .
SFX 209 0 ීහි .
SFX 209 0 ූහු .
SFX 209 0 ීය .

SFX 210 Y 17
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වා .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වෙමි .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වෙමු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වෙහි .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වෙහු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වේය .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වාය .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්හ .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වහ .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වෝය .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වාලු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වේලු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්හලු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වහලු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වෝලු .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වාවේ .
SFX 210 0  ‍ෙව්වදෙන් .

SFX 211 Y 3	
SFX 211 0 පු .
SFX 211 0 ා .
SFX 211 0 ලා .

SFX 212 Y 1	
SFX 212 0 ුව .

SFX 213 Y 24
SFX 213 0 න .
SFX 213 0 නා .
SFX 213 ි වන .
SFX 213 ි වනා .
SFX 213 ි වපු .
SFX 213 ි වා .
SFX 213 ි වලා .
SFX 213 ි මින් .
SFX 213 ි වමින් .
SFX 213 0 ත්ම .
SFX 213 ි වත්ම .
SFX 213 0 න්න .
SFX 213 0 න්නට .
SFX 213 0 න්ට .
SFX 213 ි වන්න .
SFX 213 ි වන්නට .
SFX 213 0 ද්දී .
SFX 213 0 ත්දී .
SFX 213 ි වද්දී .
SFX 213 ි වත්දී .
SFX 213 0 තොත් .
SFX 213 ි වතොත් .
SFX 213 0 තත් .
SFX 213 ි වතත් .

SFX 214 Y 50
SFX 214 0 ෙන .
SFX 214 0 ෙනා .
SFX 214 0 වෙන .
SFX 214 0 වෙනා .
SFX 214 0 ූ .
SFX 214 0 ුණ .
SFX 214 0 ුණු .
SFX 214 0 ිච්ච .
SFX 214 0 වූ .
SFX 214 0 ෙව්ව .
SFX 214 0 වුණු .
SFX 214 0 වෙව්ව .
SFX 214 0 ී .
SFX 214 0 ිලා .
SFX 214 0 වී .
SFX 214 0 විලා .
SFX 214 0 ෙමින් .
SFX 214 0 වෙමින් .
SFX 214 0 ෙත්ම .
SFX 214 0 වෙත්ම .
SFX 214 0 ෙන්න .
SFX 214 0 ෙන්ට .
SFX 214 0 ෙන්නට .
SFX 214 0 ීමට .	
SFX 214 0 වෙන්න  .
SFX 214 0 වෙන්ට  .
SFX 214 0 වෙන්නට  .
SFX 214 0 වීමට .	
SFX 214 0 ිය .
SFX 214 0 විය .
SFX 214 0 ෙද්දී .
SFX 214 0 ෙත්දී .
SFX 214 0 වෙද්දී .
SFX 214 0 වෙත්දී .
SFX 214 0 ුවොත් .
SFX 214 0 ුවොතින් .
SFX 214 0 ෙතොත් .
SFX 214 0 ුණොත් .
SFX 214 0 ුණොතින් .
SFX 214 0 ෙව්වොත් .
SFX 214 0 ෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 214 0 වෙතොත් .
SFX 214 0 වුණොත් .
SFX 214 0 වුණොතින් .
SFX 214 0 ුවත් .
SFX 214 0 ෙතත් .
SFX 214 0 ුණත් .
SFX 214 0 ෙව්වත් .
SFX 214 0 වෙතත් .
SFX 214 0 වුණත් .

SFX 215 Y 2
SFX 215 0 පු .
SFX 215 0 ලා .
	
SFX 216 Y 3
SFX 216 0 ුව . 
SFX 216 0 පු .
SFX 216 0 ලා .

SFX 217 Y 3
SFX 217 0 ිය .
SFX 217 0 පු .
SFX 217 0 ලා .

SFX 218 Y 13
SFX 218 0 වන .
SFX 218 0 වනා .
SFX 218 0 වපු .
SFX 218 0 වා .
SFX 218 0 වලා .
SFX 218 0 වමින් .
SFX 218 0 වත්ම .
SFX 218 0 වන්න .
SFX 218 0 වන්නට .
SFX 218 0 වද්දී .
SFX 218 0 වත්දී .
SFX 218 0 වතොත් .
SFX 218 0 වතත් .

SFX 219 Y 22
SFX 219 0 වෙන .
SFX 219 0 වෙනා .
SFX 219 0 ෙව්ව .
SFX 219 0 වුණු .
SFX 219 0 වෙව්ව .
SFX 219 0 වී .
SFX 219 0 විලා .
SFX 219 0 වෙන්න  .
SFX 219 0 වෙන්ට  .
SFX 219 0 වෙන්නට  .
SFX 219 0 වීමට .	
SFX 219 0 විය .
SFX 219 0 වෙද්දී .
SFX 219 0 වෙත්දී .
SFX 219 0 ෙව්වොත් .
SFX 219 0 ෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 219 0 වෙතොත් .
SFX 219 0 වුණොත් .
SFX 219 0 වුණොතින් .
SFX 219 0 ෙව්වත් .
SFX 219 0 වෙතත් .
SFX 219 0 වුණත් .

SFX 220 Y 22
SFX 220 0 ෙන .
SFX 220 0 ෙනා .
SFX 220 0 ුණ .
SFX 220 0 ුණු .
SFX 220 0 ිච්ච .
SFX 220 0 ී .		
SFX 220 0 ිලා .
SFX 220 0 ෙමින් .
SFX 220 0 වෙමින් .
SFX 220 0 ෙත්ම .
SFX 220 0 වෙත්ම .
SFX 220 0 ෙන්න .
SFX 220 0 ෙන්ට .
SFX 220 0 ෙන්නට .
SFX 220 0 ීමට .
SFX 220 0 ෙද්දී .
SFX 220 0 ෙත්දී .
SFX 220 0 ෙතොත් .
SFX 220 0 ුණොත් .
SFX 220 0 ුණොතින් .
SFX 220 0 ෙතත් .
SFX 220 0 ුණත් .

SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 ීය .

SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 0 ‍ෙ .

SFX 223 Y 25
SFX 223 0 න .
SFX 223 0 නා .
SFX 223 0 වන .
SFX 223 0 වනා .
SFX 223 0 වපු .
SFX 223 0 වා .
SFX 223 0 වලා .
SFX 223 0 මින් .
SFX 223 0 වමින් .
SFX 223 0 ත්ම .
SFX 223 0 වත්ම .
SFX 223 0 න්න .
SFX 223 0 න්නට .
SFX 223 0 වන්න  .
SFX 223 0 වන්ට .
SFX 223 0 වන්නට . 
SFX 223 0 ද්දී .
SFX 223 0 ත්දී .
SFX 223 0 වද්දී .
SFX 223 0 ත්දී .
SFX 223 0 වත් .
SFX 223 0 තොත් .
SFX 223 0 වතොත් .
SFX 223 0 තත් .
SFX 223 0 වතත් .

SFX 224 Y 51
SFX 224 0 ෙන .
SFX 224 0 ෙනා .
SFX 224 0 වෙන  .
SFX 224 0 වෙනා .
SFX 224 0 ුණ .
SFX 224 0 ුණු .
SFX 224 0 ිච්ච .
SFX 224 0 වූ .
SFX 224 0 ෙව්ව .
SFX 224 0 වුණු .
SFX 224 0 වෙව්ව . 
SFX 224 0 ී .
SFX 224 0 ිලා .
SFX 224 0 වී .
SFX 224 0 විලා .
SFX 224 0 ෙමින් .
SFX 224 0 වෙමින් .
SFX 224 0 ෙත්ම .
SFX 224 0 වෙත්ම .
SFX 224 0 ෙන්න .
SFX 224 0 ෙන්ට .
SFX 224 0 ෙන්නට .
SFX 224 0 ීමට .
SFX 224 0 වෙන්න . 
SFX 224 0 වෙන්ට  .
SFX 224 0 වෙන්නට . 
SFX 224 0 වීමට  .
SFX 224 0 ිය .
SFX 224 0 විය .
SFX 224 0 ෙද්දී .
SFX 224 0 ෙත් .
SFX 224 0 වෙද්දී .
SFX 224 0 ත්දී .
SFX 224 0 වෙත් .
SFX 224 0 ුවොත් .
SFX 224 0 ුවොතින් .
SFX 224 0 ෙතොත් .
SFX 224 0 ුණොත් .
SFX 224 0 ුණොතින් .
SFX 224 0 වහොත් .
SFX 224 0 ෙව්වොත් .
SFX 224 0 ෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 224 0 වෙතොත් .
SFX 224 0 වුණොත් .
SFX 224 0 වුණොතින් .
SFX 224 0 ුවත් .
SFX 224 0 ෙතත් .
SFX 224 0 ුණත් .
SFX 224 0 ෙව්වත් .
SFX 224 0 වෙතත් .
SFX 224 0 වුණත් .

SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 ‍ෙ ීය .

SFX 226 Y 17 
SFX 226 0 වා .
SFX 226 0 වෙමි .
SFX 226 0 වෙමු .
SFX 226 0 වෙහි .
SFX 226 0 වෙහු .
SFX 226 0 වේය .
SFX 226 0 වාය .
SFX 226 0 හ .
SFX 226 0 වහ .
SFX 226 0 වෝය .
SFX 226 0 වාලු .
SFX 226 0 වේලු .
SFX 226 0 හලු .
SFX 226 0 වහලු .
SFX 226 0 වෝලු .
SFX 226 0 වාවේ .
SFX 226 0 වදෙන් .

SFX 227 Y 24
SFX 227 0 න .
SFX 227 0 නා .
SFX 227 0 වන .
SFX 227 0 වනා .
SFX 227 0 වපු .
SFX 227 0 වා .
SFX 227 0 වලා .
SFX 227 0 ම  .
SFX 227 0 වම  .
SFX 227 0 ත්ම .
SFX 227 0 වත්ම .
SFX 227 0 න්න .
SFX 227 0 න්නට .
SFX 227 0 න්ට .
SFX 227 0 වන්න .
SFX 227 0 වන්නට .
SFX 227 0 ද්දී .
SFX 227 0 ත්දී .
SFX 227 0 වද්දී .
SFX 227 0 වත්දී .
SFX 227 0 තොත් .
SFX 227 0 වතොත් .
SFX 227 0 තත් .
SFX 227 0 වතත් .
