API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
කම/200,204,211,223
තව/200,204,211,223
නිව/200,204,211,223
බාව/200,204,211,223
ලිය/200,204,211,223
සප/200,204,211,223
හූර/200,204,211,223
අකුළ/200,204,211,223
අසුර/200,204,211,223
උහුල/200,204,211,223
ගල්ව/200,204,211,223
දිවුර/200,204,211,223
මතුර/200,204,211,223
විමස/200,204,211,223
පිරික්ස/200,204,211,223
කළා/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
තැන/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
නෑව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
බැහ/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ලැළ/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
වේළ/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
හිත/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ඇන්ද/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ඉපැව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
ගැහට/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
නිපැව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
පෙබැව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
වැටැල/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
සැඟෙව/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
හෙල්ල/201,203,205,206,207,208,212,224
අත්දකි/200,204,213,223
ඉහි/200,204,213,223
කල්බඳි/200,204,213,223
ගිවිසි/200,204,213,223
පටබඳි/200,204,213,223
බදි/200,204,213,223
රකි/200,204,213,223
වහි/200,204,213,223
සසි/200,204,213,223
ඇන්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
ඇවිස්සා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
ඉම්බා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
ඉගන්නා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
කරබින්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
කෙව/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
තැප/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
නැංගා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
පිම්බා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
බැද්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
මැන්නා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
ලැග්ගා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
වැස්සා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
සැබැන්දා/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
සිරැක/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,215,224
කටි/200,204,213,223
නමදි/200,204,213,223
බුදි/200,204,213,223
විසි/200,204,213,223
උපදි/200,204,213,223
කැණ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
නැමැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
නැමද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
යැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
බිද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
ඇමැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
හැමැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
හැමද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
කාවැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
වැරැද/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
පැවැත/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
වැට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
මුණැගැස/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
සුරැක/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
පැවැත/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
පැඩ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
රඳාපැවත/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
බලපැවැත/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,216,224
මඬි/200,204,213,223
වැඩ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
හැර/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
මැඩ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
මුදාහැර/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
ඇර/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
ඇනැහිට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
ඇණැහිට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
සිට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
හිට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
නැඟිට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224	
මැඬ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
අතැහැර/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
අත්හැර/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
කෙළ/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224
උකැට/202,203,205,206,207,209,210,214,217,224	
ඉක්ම/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
ඉපිල/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
එර/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
කිමිද/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
කෙලෙස/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
දිස/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
නියැළ/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
පැස/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
පිවිස/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
රිද/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
සිනාස/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
අල/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
කරක/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
කලකිර/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
හර/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224,204,218,223
ගැලැහ/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224
කලැකිර/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224
හැර/203,205,206,207,210,221,222,224
වැටෙ/200,203,225,220,223
තිබෙ/200,203,225,220,223
පෙනෙ/200,203,225,220,223
පිපෙ/200,203,225,220,223
සුපිපෙ/200,203,225,220,223
ඇදවැටෙ/200,203,225,220,223
කාවැටෙ/200,203,225,220,223
තැනවැටෙ/200,203,225,220,223
වහවැටෙ/200,203,225,220,223
කඩාවැටෙ/200,203,225,220,223
හිනැහෙ/200,203,225,220,223
පැකිළෙ/200,203,225,220,223
වැලපෙ/200,203,225,220,223
තිගැස්සෙ/200,203,225,220,223
තේරෙ/200,203,225,220,223
කෙරෙව්/226,240
කෙර/203,214,240
තබ/200,227
දන්/227				
එව/200,203,227	
පොරක/241,242,243,244,200,204,227,245
සපාක/241,242,243,244,200,204,227,245
මකාල/200,204,227,245
සවිල/200,204,227,245
ගිනිල/423,244,200,204,227,245
වළක්වාල/200,204,227,245
සපුරාල/200,204,227,245
ගා/200,204,227,246
හා/200,204,227,246
බා/200,204,227,246
උරගා/200,204,227,246
මුහුණපා/200,204,227,246
